Utah statutes.
78A-2-205.   When seal is affixed.

The seal of the court need not be affixed to any document of the court, except to:

(1)  a writ;

(2)  a certificate of the probate of a will, or of appointment of an executor, administrator, or guardian; or

(3)  the authentication of:

(a)  a copy of a record or document on file with the court; or

(b)  the signature of an officer of the court.

